esu.twol
"(g/t):g = VVFinalBase"
%(g%/t%):g <=> :Vow [:%>|:0]* :Vow [:%>|:0]* _ ;
    except
        :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase

"(g/t):t = CFinalBase"
%(g%/t%):t <=> :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase

"(ng):ng = VFinalBase"
%(ng%):ng <=> Vow: Bndry:* _ ;
    except
        [:Con|.#.] Vow: %:: _ FVow: [Bndry:|:Con|.#.] ; ! CV:(ng)VC -> CVVC
        [:Con|.#.] FVow: %:: %~: _ FVow: [Bndry:|:Con|.#.] ; ! CFV:~(ng)VC -> CVVC

"(ng):0 = :" ! - bases that get added then dropped after single vowel
%(ng%):0 <=> [:Con|.#.] Vow: %:: _ FVow: [Bndry:|:Con|.#.] ; ! CV:(ng)VC -> CVVC
             [:Con|.#.] FVow: %:: %~: _ FVow: [Bndry:|:Con|.#.] ; ! CFV:~(ng)VC -> CVVC

"(r):r = te Bases"
%(r%):r <=> :t :e %+: _ ; ! bases ending in te

"(s):s = VFinalBase"
%(s%):s <=> Vow: Bndry:* _ ; ! bases ending in a vowel

"(t):t = CFinalBase"
%(t%):t <=> :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase
    except
        :Con Bndry:* _ Bndry:* [s:|y:] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(t):c = (t)s/c"
%(t%):c <=> :Con Bndry:* _ Bndry:* [s:|y:] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(u):u = notFVow"
%(u%):u <=> [Con:|e:] Bndry:* _ ; ! notFVow = Con|e

"(u/i):i = te:(u/i)/ci"
%(u%/i%):i <=> t:c (ʼ) e: (%°:) %:: _ ; ! te:(u/i)/ci

"(u/i):u = [Con|e-te]:(u/i)/Cu"
%(u%/i%):u <=> \:FVow %:: _ ; ! [Con|e-te]:(u/i)/Cu
    except
        t:c (ʼ) e: (%°:) %:: _ ; ! te:(u/i)/ci

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!     OPERATOR      !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! "Rule for Plus" - useless
! "Rule for Period" - useless

"%:0 = percentWeak" ! percent weak
%%:0 <=> FVow: r: [Bndry:-%*:]* _ ;

"':ʼ = ApostropheRule"
%':%ʼ <=> .#. (Con) Vow Con e:0 [ Bndry: - %~: ]* _ ; ! "Rule for Apostrophe - short bases"
